Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB891.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5 of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 5. Examinations and Certificates.--* * *(f) The Board shall immediately admit to examination an eligible applicant who has satisfactorily completed a nursing education program approved and listed under sections 6.1 and 6.2 for the preparation of registered professional nurses upon receipt of a nursing education verification under this subsection. The approved nursing education program shall submit the nursing education verification to the Board immediately upon 123456789101112131415161718192021 the eligible applicant's satisfactory completion of the approved nursing education program. The Board shall not delay admission to examination for an eligible applicant who meets the requirements under this subsection.Section 2. The provisions of 49 Pa. Code §§ 21.21 and 21.23 are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of section 5(f) of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0891PN1002 - 2 - 12345678